incubator/apertium-en-sco/apertium-en-sco.sco.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <!-- symbols -->
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="cog"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="fts"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="pron"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="apos"/>
    <sdef n="percent"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="sep"/>
    <sdef n="sint"/>
    <sdef n="email"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="subs"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>
    <sdef n="url"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="vbdo"/>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="pres"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="sym"/>
    <sdef n="ND"/>
    <sdef n="GD"/>
    <sdef n="mon"/>
  </sdefs>
  
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="uuml">
      <e>
	      <p>
          <l>ü</l>
	        <r>ü</r>
	      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
	      <p>
	        <l>ue</l>
	        <r>ü</r>
	      </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ouml">
      <e>
	      <p>
          <l>ö</l>
	        <r>ö</r>
	      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
	      <p>
	        <l>oe</l>
	        <r>ö</r>
	      </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="na__S">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r><j/>na<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>nae</l>
          <r><j/>na<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>naw</l>
          <r><j/>na<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="verra__preadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="preadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mark__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mary__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Barcelona__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="eneuch__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>A</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ye</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>he</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>she</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="Southern">
        <p>
          <l>shi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>hit</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>we</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>thay</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="probj__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ye</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>you</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>him</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>her</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>hit</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>hus</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>thaim</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="prsubj"><i></i><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="probj"><i></i><par n="probj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="verra"><i>verra</i><par n="verra__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="mair"><i>mair</i><par n="verra__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="maist"><i>maist</i><par n="verra__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="eneuch"><i>eneuch</i><par n="eneuch__det"/></e>
    <e lm="mair"><i>mair</i><par n="eneuch__det"/></e>
    <e lm="maist"><i>maist</i><par n="eneuch__det"/></e>
    <e lm="Barcelona"><i>Barcelona</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Sparta"><i>Sparta</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Greece"><i>Greece</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Spain"><i>Spain</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Scotland"><i>Scotland</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ingland"><i>Ingland</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Unitit Kinrick"><i>Unitit<b/>Kinrick</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lunnon"><i>Lunnon</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Northren Ireland"><i>Northren<b/>Ireland</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ireland"><i>Ireland</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Northren Irland"><i>Northren<b/>Irland</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Irland"><i>Irland</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="German Ocean"><i>German<b/>Ocean</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Catalonie"><i>Catalonie</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Fraunce"><i>Fraunce</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Inglis Chainnel"><i>Inglis<b/>Chainnel</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Erse Sea"><i>Erse<b/>Sea</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Wastmeenster"><i>Wastmeenster</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Roushie"><i>Roushie</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Aicardo"><i>Aicardo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Alvino"><i>Alvino</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Antonio"><i>Antonio</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Arturo"><i>Arturo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Beato"><i>Beato</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Camilo"><i>Camilo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Clacer"><i>Clacer</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Damiano"><i>Damiano</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Dionisio"><i>Dionisio</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Eleázar"><i>Eleázar</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Fabián"><i>Fabián</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Godofredo"><i>Godofredo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ireneo"><i>Ireneo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lamberto"><i>Lamberto</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Matco"><i>Matco</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Nodiel"><i>Nodiel</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Pompilio"><i>Pompilio</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Sotero"><i>Sotero</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Vitoldo"><i>Vitoldo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Antonio"><i>Antonio</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Coleman"><i>Coleman</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Efren"><i>Efren</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Irvin"><i>Irvin</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Julius"><i>Julius</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mathew"><i>Mathew</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Rhys"><i>Rhys</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Tristen"><i>Tristen</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Martín"><i>Martín</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Jürgen Trumpf"><i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen<b/>Trumpf</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Jürgen"><i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Tönis"><i>T</i><par n="ouml"/><i>nis</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Alenyani"><i>Alenyani</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Balulde"><i>Balulde</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Bonina"><i>Bonina</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Cebele"><i>Cebele</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Dana"><i>Dana</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Edel"><i>Edel</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Flaviana"><i>Flaviana</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Gioia"><i>Gioia</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Helvetia"><i>Helvetia</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Indamira"><i>Indamira</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Katya"><i>Katya</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Maimará"><i>Maimará</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Neri"><i>Neri</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Piedad"><i>Piedad</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Salustiana"><i>Salustiana</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Talia"><i>Talia</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Wanda"><i>Wanda</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Alex"><i>Alex</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Blanca"><i>Blanca</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Destinee"><i>Destinee</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Hope"><i>Hope</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Kara"><i>Kara</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lizeth"><i>Lizeth</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Nayeli"><i>Nayeli</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Sierra"><i>Sierra</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lara"><i>Lara</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
